Florida, session 2026, HB1423.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (4) and (5) of section 768.0706,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) and (6),
respectively, and a new subsection (4) is added to that section,
to read:
768.0706 Multifamily residential property safety and
security; presumption against liability.—
(4) The owner or principal operator of a multifamily
residential property may not receive a presumption against
liability under this section if two or more of the following
crimes have been reported to the owner or principal operator to
have occurred at the property in the 24 months preceding the
subject incident:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1423-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1423 2026
(a) Murder;
(b) Robbery;
(c) Sexual battery;
(d) Aggravated assault;
(e) Battery;
(f) Kidnapping or false imprisonment; or
(g) A crime involving a firearm.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1423-01-c1